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DTC B0 135/73 Short in P/T Squib (LH) Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
The P/T squib (LH) circuit consists of the airbag sensor assembly and seat belt pretensioner (LH).
It causes the seat belt pretensioner (LH) to activate when the seat belt pretensioner (LH) activation condi-
tions are satisfied.
For details of the function of each component, see OPERATION on page RS−2.
DTC B0135/73 is recorded when a short is detected in the P/T squib (LH) circuit.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

B0135/73

SShort circuit betweenPL+wireharnessandPL − wirehar-
ness of squib
SP/Tsquib (LH)malfunction
SAirbagsensorassemblymalfunction

SSeatbeltpretensioner (LH)
SAirbagsensorassembly
SWireharness
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Prepare for inspection. (See step 1 on page DI−549)

2 Check P/T squib (LH) circuit.

PREPARATION:
Release airbag activation prevention mechanism of the con-
nector (on the airbag sensor assembly side) between the airbag
sensor assembly and the seat belt pretensioner (LH).
(See page DI−447)
CHECK:
For the connector (on the seat belt pretensioner side) between
theseatbeltpretensioner (LH)and theairbagsensorassembly,
measure the resistancebetweenPL+andPL −.
OK:

Resistance: 1 M� orHigher

NG Go to step 5.

OK
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3 Check airbag sensor assembly.

PREPARATION:
(a) Connect the connector to the airbag sensor assembly.
(b) Using a service wire, connect PL+ and PL− of the connec-

tor (on the seat belt pretensioner side) between the airbag
sensor assembly and the seat belt pretensioner (LH).

(c) Connect negative (−) terminal cable to the battery, and
wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:
(a) Turn ignition switch to ACC or ON and wait at least for 20

seconds.
(b) Clear DTC stored in memory.

(See page DI−447)
(c) Turn ignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 20 se-

conds.
(d) Turn ignition switch to ACC or ON, and wait at least for 20

seconds.
(e) Check DTC.

(See page DI−447)
OK:

DTCB0 135/73 isnotoutput.
HINT:
Codes other than code B0135/73 may be output at this time, but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG Replace airbag sensor assembly.

OK
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4 Check P/T squib (LH).

PREPARATION:
(a) Turn ignition switch to LOCK.
(b) Disconnect negative (−) terminal cable from the battery,

and wait at least for 90 seconds.
(c) Connect the seat belt pretensioner (LH) connector.
(d) Connect negative (−) terminal cable to the battery, and

wait at least for 2 seconds.
CHECK:
(a) Turn ignition switch to LOOK, and wait at least for 20 se-

cond.
(b) Turn ignition switch to ACC or ON, and wait at least for 20

seconds.
(c) Clear DTC stored in memory.

(See page DI−447)
(d) Turn ignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 20 se-

conds.
(e) Turn ignition switch to ACC or ON, and wait at least for 20

seconds.
(f)CheckDTC.

(See page DI−447)
OK:

DTCB0 135/73 isnotoutput.
HINT:
Codes other than code B0135/73 may be output at this time, but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG Replace seat belt pretensioner (LH).

OK

From the results of the above inspection, the malfunctioning part can now be considered normal.
To make sure of this, use the simulation method to check.
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5 Check floor wire harness.

PREPARATION:
(a) Disconnect floor wire harness connector on the airbag

sensor assembly side.
(b) Release airbag activation prevention mechanism of the

floor wire harness connector on the airbag sensor assem-
bly side. (See page DI−447)

CHECK:
For the connector (on the floor wire harness side) between the
seat belt pretensioner and the floor wire harness, measure the
resistance between PL+ and PL−.
OK:

Resistance: 1 M � or Higher

NG Repair or replace floor wire harness.

OK

6 Check harness between airbag sensor assembly and floor wire harness.

PREPARATION:
Release airbag activation prevention mechanism of the airbag
sensor assembly connector. (See page DI−447)
CHECK:
For the connector (on the floor wire harness side) between the
airbag sensor assembly and floor wire harness, measure the re-
sistance between PL+ and PL−.
OK:

Resistance: 1 M� or Higher

NG Repair or replace harness or connector be-
tween airbag sensor assembly and floor wire
harness.

OK

From the results of the above inspection, the malfunctioning part can now be considered normal.
To make sure of this, use the simulation method to check.


